Maryland, session 2025, HB1469.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–602.
(a) There is a State Free Feeding Program.
(b) (1) Each year the State Superintendent shall determine the amount of
State money required to provide the Program in accordance with the standards adopted by
the State Board under this subtitle.
(2) The amount included for this Program in the annual State budget,
including any federal funds AND FUNDS FROM THE HEALTHY SCHOOL MEALS FOR ALL
FUND UNDER § 7–606 OF THIS SUBTITLE, and as submitted to and appropriated by the
General Assembly, shall be distributed to the county boards and participating nonpublic
schools in the same manner as the process established under § 5–205 of this article.
7–606.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “FUND” MEANS THE HEALTHY SCHOOL MEALS FOR
ALL FUND.
(B) THERE IS A HEALTHY SCHOOL MEALS FOR ALL FUND.
(C) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO PROVIDE FUNDING FOR:

HOUSE BILL 1469 3
(1) THE STATE FREE FEEDING PROGRAM UNDER § 7–602 OF THIS
SUBTITLE; AND
(2) THE MARYLAND MEALS FOR ACHIEVEMENT IN–CLASSROOM
BREAKFAST PROGRAM UNDER § 7–704 OF THIS TITLE.
(D) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND.
(E) (1) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(2) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND SEPARATELY,
AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(F) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(1) REVENUE DISTRIBUTED TO THE FUND UNDER § 2–14A–02 OF THE
TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE;
(2) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE FUND;
AND
(3) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED FOR
THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(G) THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY FOR PROVIDING MEALS THROUGH THE
STATE FREE FEEDING PROGRAM AND THE MARYLAND MEALS FOR ACHIEVEMENT
IN–CLASSROOM BREAKFAST PROGRAM.
(H) (1) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE FUND
IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.
(2) ANY INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE CREDITED TO
THE GENERAL FUND OF THE STATE.
(I) EXPENDITURES FROM THE FUND MAY BE MADE ONLY IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THE STATE BUDGET.
(J) MONEY EXPENDED FROM THE FUND FOR THE STATE FREE FEEDING
PROGRAM AND THE MARYLAND MEALS FOR ACHIEVEMENT IN–CLASSROOM
BREAKFAST PROGRAM IS SUPPLEMENTAL TO AND IS NOT INTENDED TO TAKE THE
PLACE OF FUNDING THAT OTHERWISE WOULD BE APPROPRIATED FOR THE
PROGRAMS.

HOUSE BILL 1469
7–704.
(b) (1) There is a school breakfast program in the State, known as the
Maryland Meals for Achievement In–Classroom Breakfast Program.
(2) The Program is a joint effort of the Department and the county boards
or sponsoring agencies for eligible nonpublic schools.
(c) (1) The purpose of the Program is to provide funding for a school that
makes an in–classroom breakfast available to all students in the school.
(2) The funding is intended to complement the funding received by a school
from the federal government for a school breakfast program.
Article – Tax – General
1–101.
(a) In this article the following words have the meanings indicated.
(V) “SUGARY BEVERAGE DISTRIBUTOR TAX” MEANS THE TAX IMPOSED
UNDER TITLE 11.5 OF THIS ARTICLE.
2–102.
(a) In addition to the duties set forth elsewhere in this article and in other articles
of the Code, the Comptroller shall administer the laws that relate to:
(9) the sales and use tax; [and]
(10) the savings and loan association franchise tax; AND
(11) THE SUGARY BEVERAGE DISTRIBUTOR TAX.
SUBTITLE 14A. SUGARY BEVERAGE DISTRIBUTOR TAX REVENUE DISTRIBUTION.
2–14A–01.
FROM THE SUGARY BEVERAGE DISTRIBUTOR TAX REVENUE, THE
COMPTROLLER SHALL DISTRIBUTE THE AMOUNT NECESSARY TO ADMINISTER THE
SUGARY BEVERAGE DISTRIBUTOR TAX LAWS TO AN ADMINISTRATIVE COST
ACCOUNT.
2–14A–02.

HOUSE BILL 1469 5
AFTER MAKING THE DISTRIBUTION UNDER § 2–14A–01 OF THIS SUBTITLE,
EACH FISCAL YEAR THE COMPTROLLER SHALL DISTRIBUTE THE REMAINING
SUGARY BEVERAGE DISTRIBUTOR TAX REVENUE AS FOLLOWS:
(1) THE FIRST $189,000,000 TO THE HEALTHY SCHOOL MEALS FOR
ALL FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 7–606 OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE;
(2) THE NEXT $50,000,000 TO THE CHILD CARE SCHOLARSHIP
PROGRAM ESTABLISHED UNDER § 9.5–113 OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE WITHIN
THE STATE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION; AND
(3) THE REMAINDER TO THE GENERAL FUND OF THE STATE.
TITLE 11.5. SUGARY BEVERAGE DISTRIBUTOR TAX.
SUBTITLE 1. DEFINITIONS.
11.5–101.
(A) IN THIS TITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) (1) “BEVERAGE FOR MEDICAL USE” MEANS A BEVERAGE SUITABLE
FOR HUMAN CONSUMPTION AND MANUFACTURED FOR USE AS:
(I) AN ORAL THERAPY FOR PERSONS WHO CANNOT ABSORB OR
METABOLIZE DIETARY NUTRIENTS FROM FOOD OR BEVERAGES; OR
(II) AN ORAL REHYDRATION ELECTROLYTE SOLUTION FOR
INFANTS AND CHILDREN FORMULATED TO PREVENT OR TREAT DEHYDRATION DUE
TO ILLNESS.
(2) “BEVERAGE FOR MEDICAL USE” INCLUDES A MEDICAL FOOD, AS
DEFINED IN 21 U.S.C. § 360EE(B)(3).
(3) “BEVERAGE FOR MEDICAL USE” DOES NOT INCLUDE A SPORT
DRINK.
(C) “CONSUMER” MEANS A PERSON WHO PURCHASES A SUGARY BEVERAGE
FOR CONSUMPTION AND NOT FOR SALE TO ANOTHER PERSON.

HOUSE BILL 1469
(D) “DISTRIBUTOR” MEANS A PERSON, INCLUDING A MANUFACTURER OR
WHOLESALE DEALER, WHO RECEIVES, STORES, MANUFACTURES, PACKAGES, OR
DISTRIBUTES PACKAGED SUGARY BEVERAGES, SYRUPS, OR POWDERS FOR SALE TO
RETAILERS DOING BUSINESS IN THE STATE, WHETHER OR NOT THE PERSON ALSO
SELLS THOSE PRODUCTS TO CONSUMERS.
(E) “MILK” MEANS:
(1) NATURAL LIQUID MILK, REGARDLESS OF ANIMAL OR PLANT
SOURCE OR BUTTERFAT CONTENT;
(2) NATURAL MILK CONCENTRATE, WHETHER OR NOT
RECONSTITUTED; OR
(3) DEHYDRATED NATURAL MILK, WHETHER OR NOT
RECONSTITUTED.
(F) “NATURAL FRUIT JUICE” MEANS THE ORIGINAL LIQUID RESULTING
FROM THE PRESSING OF FRUITS OR THE LIQUID RESULTING FROM THE DILUTION
WITH WATER OF DEHYDRATED FRUIT JUICE.
(G) “NATURAL VEGETABLE JUICE” MEANS THE ORIGINAL LIQUID
RESULTING FROM THE PRESSING OF VEGETABLES OR THE LIQUID RESULTING FROM
THE DILUTION WITH WATER OF DEHYDRATED VEGETABLE JUICE.
(H) (1) “NONNUTRITIVE SWEETENER” MEANS A NONNUTRITIVE
SUBSTANCE SUITABLE FOR CONSUMPTION THAT HUMANS PERCEIVE AS SWEET AND
CONTAINS FEWER THAN FIVE CALORIES PER SERVING.
(2) “NONNUTRITIVE SWEETENER” INCLUDES ASPARTAME,
ACESULFAME–K, NEOTAME, SACCHARIN, SUCRALOSE, STEVIA, AND OTHER
ARTIFICIAL SWEETENERS.
(3) “NONNUTRITIVE SWEETENER” DOES NOT INCLUDE SUGAR.
(I) “PLACE OF BUSINESS” MEANS A PLACE OF BUSINESS WHERE SUGARY
BEVERAGES, SYRUPS, OR POWDERS ARE MANUFACTURED OR RECEIVED FOR SALE
IN THE STATE.
(J) “POWDER” MEANS ANY SOLID MIXTURE OF INGREDIENTS USED IN
MAKING, MIXING, OR COMPOUNDING SUGARY BEVERAGES BY MIXING THAT MIXTURE
WITH ONE OR MORE OTHER INGREDIENTS, INCLUDING ICE, SYRUP, SIMPLE SYRUP,

HOUSE BILL 1469 7
FRUITS, VEGETABLES, FRUIT JUICE, VEGETABLE JUICE, AND CARBONATION OR
OTHER GAS.
(K) “RETAILER” MEANS A PERSON WHO SELLS OR OTHERWISE DISPENSES
SUGARY BEVERAGES TO CONSUMERS, WHETHER OR NOT THE PERSON IS ALSO A
DISTRIBUTOR.
(L) “SALE” MEANS THE TRANSFER OF TITLE OR POSSESSION FOR VALUABLE
CONSIDERATION, REGARDLESS OF THE MANNER BY WHICH THE TRANSFER IS
COMPLETED.
(M) (1) “SUGAR” MEANS A MONOSACCHARIDE OR DISACCHARIDE
NUTRITIVE SWEETENER THAT CONTAINS AT LEAST FIVE CALORIES PER SERVING.
(2) “SUGAR” INCLUDES GLUCOSE, FRUCTOSE, LACTOSE, AND
SUCROSE.
(N) (1) “SUGARY BEVERAGE” MEANS A BEVERAGE, WHETHER
CARBONATED OR NONCARBONATED, THAT:
(I) IS INTENDED FOR HUMAN CONSUMPTION AND CONTAINS
ADDED SUGARS OR NONNUTRITIVE SWEETENERS; AND
(II) IS NOT AN ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE, AS DEFINED UNDER §
1–101 OF THE ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES AND CANNABIS ARTICLE.
(2) “SUGARY BEVERAGE” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
(I) NATURAL FRUIT JUICE;
(II) NATURAL VEGETABLE JUICE;
(III) MILK;
(IV) INFANT FORMULA;
(V) A BEVERAGE FOR MEDICAL USE; OR
(VI) WATER THAT IS NOT FLAVORED USING SUGAR OR
NONNUTRITIVE SWEETENERS.
(O) “SYRUP” MEANS A LIQUID MIXTURE OF INGREDIENTS USED IN MAKING,
MIXING, OR COMPOUNDING SUGARY BEVERAGES USING ONE OR MORE OTHER

HOUSE BILL 1469
INGREDIENTS, INCLUDING WATER, ICE, POWDER, SIMPLE SYRUP, FRUITS,
VEGETABLES, FRUIT JUICE, VEGETABLE JUICE, AND CARBONATION OR OTHER GAS.
SUBTITLE 2. SUGARY BEVERAGE DISTRIBUTOR REGISTRY.
11.5–201.
(A) A DISTRIBUTOR DOING BUSINESS IN THE STATE SHALL REGISTER EACH
PLACE OF BUSINESS OWNED AND OPERATED BY THE DISTRIBUTOR WITH THE
COMPTROLLER IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 11.5–202 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) A DISTRIBUTOR MAY NOT SELL A SUGARY BEVERAGE, SYRUP, OR
POWDER IN THE STATE UNLESS THE DISTRIBUTOR HAS REGISTERED WITH THE
COMPTROLLER IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION.
11.5–202.
(A) EACH DISTRIBUTOR SHALL SUBMIT ON A FORM AND IN THE FORMAT THE
COMPTROLLER SPECIFIES:
(1) THE NAME OF THE DISTRIBUTOR;
(2) THE OWNERS OF THE DISTRIBUTOR;
(3) THE STREET ADDRESS AND TELEPHONE NUMBER OF EACH PLACE
OF BUSINESS OWNED AND OPERATED BY THE DISTRIBUTOR;
(4) THE NATURE OF THE BUSINESS IN WHICH THE DISTRIBUTOR IS
ENGAGED; AND
(5) ANY OTHER INFORMATION THAT THE COMPTROLLER REQUIRES.
(B) (1) IF A DISTRIBUTOR COMPLIES WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS
SECTION, THE COMPTROLLER SHALL APPROVE THE REGISTRATION.
(2) A REGISTRATION UNDER THIS SECTION IS VALID UNTIL
DECEMBER 31 OF THE YEAR IN WHICH THE COMPTROLLER APPROVES THE
REGISTRATION.
SUBTITLE 3. SUGARY BEVERAGE DISTRIBUTOR TAX.
11.5–301.

HOUSE BILL 1469 9
EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 11.5–303 OF THIS SUBTITLE, BEGINNING JULY 1,
2026, A TAX IS IMPOSED ON EACH DISTRIBUTOR FOR THE PRIVILEGE OF SELLING
SUGARY BEVERAGES, SYRUPS, AND POWDER IN THE STATE.
11.5–302.
(A) THE RATE OF THE SUGARY BEVERAGE DISTRIBUTOR TAX IS:
(1) WITH RESPECT TO SUGARY BEVERAGES SOLD TO A RETAILER FOR
SALE IN THE STATE TO A CONSUMER OR, IN THE CASE OF A DISTRIBUTOR WHO IS
ALSO A RETAILER, DIRECTLY OFFERED FOR SALE TO A CONSUMER IN THE STATE BY
THE DISTRIBUTOR, 2 CENTS PER OUNCE OF SUGARY BEVERAGE; AND
(2) WITH RESPECT TO SYRUPS OR POWDERS SOLD TO A RETAILER IN
THE STATE TO A CONSUMER OR, IN THE CASE OF A DISTRIBUTOR WHO IS ALSO A
RETAILER, DIRECTLY OFFERED FOR SALE TO A CONSUMER IN THE STATE BY THE
DISTRIBUTOR, 2 CENTS PER OUNCE OF THE SUGARY BEVERAGE PRODUCED FROM
THAT SYRUP OR POWDER BASED ON THE LARGER OF:
(I) THE LARGEST VOLUME RESULTING FROM THE USE OF THE
SYRUP OR POWDER ACCORDING TO ANY MANUFACTURER’S INSTRUCTIONS; OR
(II) THE ACTUAL VOLUME PRODUCED BY THE RETAILER, AS
REASONABLY DETERMINED BY THE COMPTROLLER.
(B) (1) THE SUGARY BEVERAGE DISTRIBUTOR TAX RATES SPECIFIED
UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION SHALL BE INCREASED ON JULY 1, 2027,
AND JULY 1 EACH SUBSEQUENT YEAR IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION.
(2) ON OR BEFORE JUNE 1 EACH YEAR, THE COMPTROLLER SHALL
DETERMINE AND ANNOUNCE:
(I) THE GROWTH IN THE CONSUMER PRICE INDEX FOR ALL
URBAN CONSUMERS AS DETERMINED BY THE COMPTROLLER UNDER PARAGRAPH
(3) OF THIS SUBSECTION; AND
(II) THE SUGARY BEVERAGE DISTRIBUTOR TAX RATES
EFFECTIVE FOR THE FISCAL YEAR BEGINNING ON THE FOLLOWING JULY 1 AS
DETERMINED BY THE COMPTROLLER UNDER PARAGRAPH (4) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(3) (I) IN THIS PARAGRAPH, “CONSUMER PRICE INDEX FOR ALL
URBAN CONSUMERS” MEANS THE CONSUMER PRICE INDEX FOR ALL URBAN

HOUSE BILL 1469
CONSUMERS FOR THE MID–ATLANTIC STATISTICAL AREA PUBLISHED BY THE U.S.
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR.
(II) THE PERCENTAGE GROWTH IN THE CONSUMER PRICE
INDEX FOR ALL URBAN CONSUMERS SHALL BE DETERMINED BY COMPARING THE
AVERAGE OF THE INDEX FOR THE 12 MONTHS ENDING ON THE PRECEDING APRIL 30
TO THE AVERAGE OF THE INDEX FOR THE PRIOR 12 MONTHS.
(4) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (5) OF THIS SUBSECTION, ON JULY 1
EACH YEAR, THE SUGARY BEVERAGE DISTRIBUTOR TAX RATES SPECIFIED UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION SHALL BE INCREASED BY THE AMOUNT, ROUNDED
TO THE NEAREST ONE–TENTH OF A CENT, THAT EQUALS THE PRODUCT OF
MULTIPLYING:
(I) THE SUGARY BEVERAGE DISTRIBUTOR TAX RATE IN EFFECT
ON THE DATE OF THE COMPTROLLER’S ANNOUNCEMENT UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF
THIS SUBSECTION; AND
(II) THE PERCENTAGE GROWTH IN THE CONSUMER PRICE
INDEX FOR ALL URBAN CONSUMERS.
(5) IF THERE IS A DECLINE OR NO GROWTH IN THE CONSUMER PRICE
INDEX FOR ALL URBAN CONSUMERS, THE SUGARY BEVERAGE DISTRIBUTOR TAX
RATE SHALL REMAIN UNCHANGED.
11.5–303.
A DISTRIBUTOR SHALL EXCLUDE THE FOLLOWING SUGARY BEVERAGES,
SYRUPS, AND POWDERS WHEN DETERMINING THE SUGARY BEVERAGE DISTRIBUTOR
TAX DUE UNDER THIS SUBTITLE:
(1) SUGARY BEVERAGES, SYRUPS, AND POWDERS SOLD TO THE
UNITED STATES GOVERNMENT AND AMERICAN INDIAN TRIBAL GOVERNMENTS;
(2) SUGARY BEVERAGES, SYRUPS, AND POWDERS SOLD BY A
DISTRIBUTOR OR RETAILER EXPRESSLY FOR RESALE OR CONSUMPTION OUTSIDE
THE STATE; AND
(3) SUGARY BEVERAGES, SYRUPS, OR POWDERS SOLD BY THE
DISTRIBUTOR TO ANOTHER DISTRIBUTOR THAT IS REGISTERED IN ACCORDANCE
WITH § 11.5–201 OF THIS TITLE, IF THE SALES INVOICE CLEARLY INDICATES THAT
THE SALE IS EXEMPT.

HOUSE BILL 1469 11
SUBTITLE 4. RETURNS.
11.5–401.
(A) EACH DISTRIBUTOR SHALL COMPLETE, UNDER OATH, AND FILE WITH
THE COMPTROLLER A RETURN:
(1) ON OR BEFORE THE 25TH DAY OF THE MONTH THAT FOLLOWS THE
MONTH IN WHICH THE DISTRIBUTOR SOLD OR, IN THE CASE OF A DISTRIBUTOR THAT
IS ALSO A RETAILER, OFFERED FOR SALE SUGARY BEVERAGES, SYRUPS, OR
POWDERS FOR SALE TO CONSUMERS IN THE STATE; AND
(2) IF THE COMPTROLLER SPECIFIES, BY REGULATION, ON OTHER
DATES FOR EACH MONTH IN WHICH THE DISTRIBUTOR DID NOT SELL ANY SUGARY
BEVERAGES, SYRUPS, OR POWDERS FOR SALE TO CONSUMERS IN THE STATE.
(B) A PERSON REQUIRED TO FILE A RETURN UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL
FILE WITH THE RETURN AN ATTACHMENT THAT STATES ANY INFORMATION THAT
THE COMPTROLLER REQUIRES.
11.5–402.
A PERSON REQUIRED TO FILE A RETURN UNDER § 11.5–401 OF THIS SUBTITLE
SHALL MAINTAIN RECORDS OF SUGARY BEVERAGES, SYRUPS, OR POWDERS SOLD
AND THE BASIS FOR THE CALCULATION OF THE SUGARY BEVERAGE DISTRIBUTOR
TAX OWED.
SUBTITLE 5. TAX PAYMENT.
11.5–501.
EACH PERSON REQUIRED TO FILE A RETURN UNDER § 11.5–401 OF THIS TITLE
SHALL PAY THE SUGARY BEVERAGE DISTRIBUTOR TAX WITH THE RETURN THAT
COVERS THE PERIOD FOR WHICH THE TAX IS DUE.
SUBTITLE 6. MISCELLANEOUS.
11–601.
THIS TITLE MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO LIMIT THE AUTHORITY OF A
POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OF THE STATE TO ADOPT OR IMPLEMENT A TAX RELATED
TO SUGARY BEVERAGES.

HOUSE BILL 1469
13–201.
In this subtitle, “tax information” means:
(4) any information contained in:
(XVI) A SUGARY BEVERAGE DISTRIBUTOR TAX RETURN;
[(xvi)] (XVII) a tire recycling fee return;
[(xvii)] (XVIII) a tobacco tax return; or
[(xviii)] (XIX) a transportation services assessment return.
13–508.
(a) Within 30 days after the date on which a notice of assessment of the
admissions and amusement tax, alcoholic beverage tax, boxing and wrestling tax, income
tax, motor carrier tax, motor fuel tax, public service company franchise tax, financial
institution franchise tax, sales and use tax, SUGARY BEVERAGE DISTRIBUTOR TAX, or
tobacco tax is mailed, a person or governmental unit against which the assessment is made
may submit to the tax collector:
(1) an application for revision of the assessment; or
(2) except for the public service company franchise tax, if the assessment
is paid, a claim for refund.
(b) If a person or governmental unit fails to submit an application for revision or
claim for refund within the time allowed in subsection (a) of this section, the assessment
becomes final.
(c) The Comptroller or an employee of the Comptroller’s office expressly
designated by the Comptroller promptly:
(1) (i) shall hold an informal hearing on a person’s or governmental
unit’s admissions and amusement tax, alcoholic beverage tax, boxing and wrestling tax,
income tax, motor carrier tax, motor fuel tax, sales and use tax, SUGARY BEVERAGE
DISTRIBUTOR TAX, or tobacco tax application for revision or claim for refund under
subsection (a) of this section; and
(ii) after the hearing:
1. shall act on the application for revision; and

HOUSE BILL 1469 13
2. may assess any additional tax, penalty, and interest due;
and
(2) shall mail to the person or governmental unit a notice of final
determination.
13–509.
(a) Notwithstanding a person’s failure to file a timely application for revision or
claim for refund of an assessment of the admissions and amusement tax, alcoholic beverage
tax, boxing and wrestling tax, income tax, motor carrier tax, motor fuel tax, sales and use
tax, SUGARY BEVERAGE DISTRIBUTOR TAX, or tobacco tax under § 13–508(a) of this
subtitle, the Comptroller or the Comptroller’s designee may issue an order decreasing or
abating an assessment to correct an erroneous assessment.
(b) If action is taken under subsection (a) of this section, the order shall state
clearly the reasons for decreasing or abating the assessment.
(c) Any order issued by the Comptroller under subsection (a) of this section shall
be final and not subject to appeal.
(d) The Comptroller’s refusal to enter an order under subsection (a) of this section
shall be final and not subject to appeal.
13–825.
(J) THE COMPTROLLER MAY REQUIRE A PERSON SUBJECT TO THE SUGARY
BEVERAGE DISTRIBUTOR TAX TO POST SECURITY FOR THE TAX IN THE AMOUNT
THAT THE COMPTROLLER DETERMINES.
13–1001.
(H) A PERSON WHO IS REQUIRED TO FILE A SUGARY BEVERAGE
DISTRIBUTOR TAX RETURN AND WHO WILLFULLY FAILS TO FILE THE RETURN AS
REQUIRED UNDER TITLE 11.5 OF THIS ARTICLE IS GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR AND
ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $5,000 OR IMPRISONMENT
NOT EXCEEDING 5 YEARS OR BOTH.
13–1002.
(b) A person, including an officer of a corporation, who willfully files a false digital
advertising gross revenues tax return, a false financial institution franchise tax return, a
false public service company franchise tax return, [or] a false income tax return, OR A
FALSE SUGARY BEVERAGE DISTRIBUTOR TAX RETURN with the intent to evade the
payment of tax due under this article is guilty of perjury and, on conviction, is subject to
the penalty for perjury.

HOUSE BILL 1469
(c) Subsections (a) and (b) of this section apply to the alcoholic beverage, digital
advertising gross revenues, financial institution franchise, public service company
franchise, [and] income, AND SUGARY BEVERAGE DISTRIBUTOR taxes.
13–1101.
(b) An assessment of digital advertising gross revenues tax, financial institution
franchise tax, public service company franchise tax, income tax, [or] estate tax, OR
SUGARY BEVERAGE DISTRIBUTOR TAX may be made at any time if:
(1) a false return is filed with the intent to evade the tax;
(2) a willful attempt is made to evade the tax;
(3) a return is not filed as required under Title 7, Title 7.5, Title 8, [or]
Title 10, OR TITLE 11.5 of this article;
(4) an amended estate tax return is not filed as required under Title 7 of
this article;
(5) an incomplete return is filed; or
(6) a report of federal adjustment is not filed within the period required
under § 13–409 of this title.
(c) If a report of federal adjustment is filed within the time required under §
13–409 of this title, the tax collector shall assess the digital advertising gross revenues tax,
financial institution franchise tax, public service company franchise tax, income tax, [or]
estate tax, OR SUGARY BEVERAGE DISTRIBUTOR TAX within 1 year after the date on
which the tax collector receives the report.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.